Utah statutes.
78B-6-1312.   Actions respecting mining claims -- Proof of customs and usage admissible.

In actions respecting mining claims proof must be admitted of the customs, usages, or regulations established and in force in the district, bar, diggings, or camp in which the claim is located.  The customs, usages, or regulations, if not in conflict with the laws of this state or of the United States, shall govern any decision in the action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

